_	On 8 November, Operation Torch landed Allied forces in Algeria (at Oran and Algiers) and Morocco (at Casablanca) with the intention that once Vichy forces in Algeria had capitulated, an advance would be made to Tunis some to the east.
_	However, these hopes were quickly dashed when the government limited Jewish immigration, with the intention that the population of Mandatory Palestine (the land west of the Jordan River) would not be more than one third of the total.
_	By an Order in Council of December 1972 Saint Peter's was declared redundant with the intention that the building be leased to the Armenian Orthodox Church.
_	From 2015, Irish Water became responsible for providing water and wastewater services, with the intention that the company would be funded through direct billing.
_	A third interpretation is that an action might be considered a complex action consisting of several stages and it is the intention that determines which of these stages are to be considered part of the action.
_	He had the intention that some of those trained in Vermont would later assist the Community at Dormition Abbey in Jerusalem.
_	Migration was encouraged by the Vietnamese authorities, with the intention that the migrants would return with skills and training.
_	Trask also arranged for a local girl, Hü King Eng, to study medicine at Ohio Wesleyan Female College, with the intention that Hü would return to practise western medicine in Fuzhou.
_	It was announced in early 2015 that the site had been handed over to artist Angus Farquhar, with the intention that part of it will become an arts venue.
_	SUSE Linux Enterprise products, including SUSE Linux Enterprise Server, receive more intense testing than the openSUSE community product, with the intention that only mature, stable versions of the included components will make it through to the released enterprise product.
_	In 2017 the senior school relocated into temporary buildings at the Park St Campus, with the intention that the Mitchell Road Campus would be occupied by the Cleveland Street Intensive English High School, freeing up the Cleveland Street site for a new 14 story 'vertical high school'.
_	The site was sold to a friendly coalition of students, with the intention that it would remain exactly as it was prior to the selling.
_	The framework replaced PCT's individual policies for assessing eligibility for continuing care and local care planning and review processes with the intention that the same criteria would be used throughout England.
_	In an interview with "Wireless Bollinger" in 2007, Barnes described his concept for the follow-up to "Hissing Fauna, Are You the Destroyer?" as an album composed of hundreds of consecutive short segments ranging from thirty to fifty seconds in length, with the intention that it "feel like one long piece with hundreds of movements."
_	In 1967 a major reorganisation of higher education was initiated, with the intention that by 1969 all previous institutions would be abolished and reconstituted.
_	These measures are applied by police and Crown attorneys with the intention that youth can be held liable through non-court measures for their offence(s).
_	At the suggestion of Assistant Secretary of the Navy (and future President of the United States) Franklin D. Roosevelt (1882-1945), businessman Payne Whitney (1876-1927) of New York City, seeking a way to contribute to the U.S. war effort during World War I, contracted with the Herreshoff Manufacturing Company at Bristol, Rhode Island, for one of a small group of 60-ton steel-hulled steam-powered boats built to a naval patrol boat design for private owners with the intention that they would be made available to the U.S. Navy in time of war.
_	His mother "disappeared suddenly and mysteriously" (presumed she died) when he was about a year old, and his father took him and Owen (aged four) to England with the intention that his own mother Ann would care of them.
_	The Court of Appeal added that it was also the intention that the Charter would not affect the division of powers, and went on to speculate that otherwise the Charter would create an "odd" situation in which a legislative body could unilaterally change the distribution of powers by reclaiming the powers it had lost under the Charter, by invoking the notwithstanding clause.
_	Although originally started for religious motives soon after the start of the Reformation, its members later came to have the intention that the League would replace the Holy Roman Empire as their focus of political allegiance.
_	Control, chief of the Circus, suspects one of the five senior intelligence officers at the Circus to be a long-standing Soviet mole and assigns code names with the intention that should his agent Jim Prideaux uncover information about the identity of the mole, Prideaux can relay it back to the Circus using a simple, easy-to-recall codename.
_	The corvettes were then placed in operational reserve, with the intention that they be reactivated for escort work in the event of another war or international crisis.
_	Originally, recipients were presented with a prize of $1,000, a gold medal, and a bronze replica, with the intention that the gold medal would "find its way to the safe deposit box," while the replica was reserved for "everyday use".
_	Most initial funding came from UK government economic initiatives, with the intention that the park would become self-sustaining.
_	Dunne was one of three Labour nominees who were nominated with the intention that, supported by their senate salaries, they would devote their energies to strengthening the organisation and finances of the Labour Party.
_	In 1748 Somerset was created Baron Warkworth, of Warkworth Castle in the County of Northumberland, and Earl of Northumberland, with remainder to his son-in-law, Sir Hugh Smithson, 4th Baronet, with the intention that the majority of the Percy estates should descend in this line.
_	He did so with the intention that the Election Funding Act laws in relation to the prohibition on political donations from property developers and the requirements for the disclosure of political donations to the Election Funding Authority would be evaded..."
_	This leads to the League, encouraged by the Flash, asking her to lead a new team with the intention that she will handle black ops missions that the League cannot due to what they represent to the public, primarily involving hunting down and eliminating metahuman threats before they go public.
_	During that same year, the local jurisdictions of Fairfax County, Arlington County, and the cities of Alexandria and Falls Church agreed to appropriate $3 million to purchase land adjacent to Mason to provide for a Fairfax Campus with the intention that the institution would expand into a regional university of major proportions, including the granting of graduate degrees.
_	Large stone warehouses were built at Freebottom, near Port Purcell (just east of Road Town), with the intention that these warehouses would facilitate exchanges of cargo between North and South America.
_	Located near the community of Canmore it was built with the intention that it would become a year-round recreation destination for Albertans.
_	This was done with the intention that they would be cascaded to outer-suburban routes alongside the Class 375s; they would be replaced on inner suburban services by Class 376 units.
_	ECHO maintains a collection of useful tropical trees and other plants and provides seed and cuttings, free of charge, to groups and farmers who request them, with the intention that seeds will be harvested from the resulting crops and distributed in the communities.
_	According to Fox, Currie believed that the song had been written with the intention that she would sing the lead vocals, but Jett insisted on singing them and, with the support of the rest of the band, did so.
_	Its basic dimensions were designed to be roughly equivalent to those of two of the DHR's existing B Class engines, with the intention that it would produce approximately double the power of those engines.
_	The primary goal of IFEA was, and remains, to strengthen the understanding and awareness of Montana State citizens of American Indian culture and history, with the intention that this would have a far-reaching social impact that would encompass such things as preservation of Indian culture, improvement of relations between the differing cultural populations of the state, and an increased knowledge and inclusivity of mindset in the citizenry.
_	At the request of the Wachowskis, as they explain in a written statement that accompanies the boxset, each of the three films is accompanied by two audio commentaries, one by philosophers who liked the films, and another by critics who didn't, with the intention that viewers use them as reference points to form their own opinion.
_	Independence Mall State Park was created in the 1950s with the intention that the land would eventually be turned over to the NPS.
_	At the end of the season the club released left-back Gareth Jelleyman, with the intention that Edwards would fulfil this role the following season.
_	It was designed in 1991 by Latz + Partner (Peter Latz), with the intention that it work to heal and understand the industrial past, rather than trying to reject it.
_	Locks by definition secure or fasten something with the intention that access be possible only with the matching key.
_	Intended to be three times the height of the section that remains, it was erected on its own foundations with the intention that, when it had settled, the west wall would be demolished and the great east arch of the tower would become the entrance to the nave.
_	The USARS was developed with the intention that it would enhance combat effectiveness by providing the opportunity for a regimental affiliation, thus obtaining some of the benefits of the traditional regimental system.
_	We have therefore already instructed the ONS to work urgently on the alternatives, with the intention that the 2011 Census will be the last of its kind."
_	Originally the facing mall was a street, Atheneum Square South, with the intention that the building be seen from that direction with the view flanked by the Beaux-Arts Municipal Building and Morgan Memorial addition to the Wadsworth Atheneum.
_	At the suggestion of Assistant Secretary of the Navy (and future President of the United States) Franklin D. Roosevelt (1882-1945), the banker and philanthropist J. P. Morgan, Jr. (1867-1943) of New York City, seeking a way to contribute to the U.S. war effort during World War I, contracted with the Herreshoff Manufacturing Company at Bristol, Rhode Island, for one of a small group of 60-ton steel-hulled steam-powered boats built to a naval patrol boat design for private owners with the intention that they would be made available to the U.S. Navy in time of war.
_	The region of Sub-Carpathia was given special autonomous status with the intention that (eventually) it would be self-governed by the Ruthenian minority.
_	With the intention that there were not more agreements without the gender perspective, at the end of October 2013 took place in Bogotá the National Summit of Women for Peace, where was a national agenda consolidated, where around 500 women from 30 of the 32 departments representations.
_	The short section between Junctions 27 and 29 was built between 1967 and 1969, by Devon County Council, as the "A38 Cullompton Bypass", with the intention that it should become part of the M5.
_	Although it is necessary to find a solution for the contest quest to win, the organizers pursue the intention that the solution is a system of cooperating autonomous programs that achieve the objectives together.
_	But before that, they were almost destructed during the Colonial period because of the imposed religion and with it the intention that the Xochimilcas forgot their gods.
_	At the suggestion of his brother Priscus, Philip became the new Praetorian prefect, with the intention that the two brothers would control the young Emperor and rule the Roman world as unofficial regents.
_	As a greenfield development, Ongar's master plan provided for a "main street" on which most commercial development would be concentrated, with the intention that it would emulate a traditional Irish village.
_	In 1970 Gerald Ellison, then Bishop of Chester, suggested that he should apply for the position of Associate Secretary-General of the General Synod of the Church of England, with the intention that, if appointed, he should succeed as Secretary-General on the retirement of Sir John Scott.
_	In 1870, Siegburg became the northern end of the East Rhine Railway ("Rechte Rheinstrecke"), with the intention that it would be later extended through the Agger valley through the Ruhr to Bochum or Essen, so that Siegburg would become a significant railway junction.
_	Outside the initial survey area centred on Adelaide, hundreds were surveyed into sections of varying sizes with the intention that the section would support a single viable farm.
_	Wright assembled a team of amateurs, which would play at Messer Street Grounds while the Grays were on the road, with the intention that if one of the senior members was injured, he could be easily replaced from among these players.
_	In addition to this, many of the larger brewers were forced to sell many of their pubs off, with the intention that they would become free houses or pass on to smaller brewers, hence increasing choice and free trade.
_	The town was named "Washington" with the intention that it might become the national capital and was the first town in America to be so named.
_	Instead, it maps a 120-degree arc, with the intention that a car will be equipped with multiple Velarray sensors—one at the front and one at the rear, or one at each of its corners.
_	As of 2008 the building was occupied by the "Société Astronomique de Liège", but was in the course of renovation with the intention that it should house the "Service Régional des Fouilles Archéologiques".
_	McDonnell writes "I affirm the intention that your relationship with the College will not be that of attorney and client."
_	While early interest in the Fantrainer was limited, RFB concentrated on the light tourer, which was named the Fanliner, with the intention that it would be able to act as a testbed for ducted fan installations for the Fantrainer as well as a prospective production aircraft in its own right.
_	Hebb and Norton intended for the MPAT to be used alone with the idea that it would aid in diagnostic tests; they also created the test with the intention that the test could be used for other experiments trying to measuring intelligence.
_	It was never the intention that the Foundation should remain a continuing body, with its own trustees.
_	Pacomio issued his warriors gunpowder and muskets, drilling his men endlessly with the intention that they would become proficient with the foreign weaponry.
_	The song was written by Clement with the intention that it be the follow-up A-side to Jerry Lee Lewis' first local hit, "Crazy Arms".
_	A fund will issue and redeem shares and interests at a price calculated by reference to the NAV of the fund, with the intention that new investors receive a fair proportion of the fund and redeeming investors receive a fair proportion of the fund's value in cash.
_	John Randolph commissioned renowned architect Henry Howard of New Orleans with the task of designing the grand mansion with the intention that no expense would be spared in the construction.
_	In 1934, he published "Le Sport de l'Air" and playfully called the aircraft "Pou du Ciel" (literally "Louse of the Sky" in French) with the intention that it would be built by amateurs.
_	Cropping was also a secondary punishment to having criminals' ears nailed to the pillory (with the intention that their body movements would tear them off).
_	The .41 Short was created with the intention that it be used in a small, single-shot derringer, which likely is the reason for the very low ballistics (most derringers were and are chambered for cartridges that were not originally intended to be used in such a small weapon).
_	He devoted much attention to the education of his son, William, with the intention that he would also become a Unitarian minister.
_	In August 1988 Hibernian played Oldham Athletic at Boundary Park and the majority of the CCS made their way there by train whilst the HBC hired a coach with the intention that they all meet up in Oldham.
_	The structure had been built with the intention that it eventually be donated to the Brothers, as the late husband had formed a strong connection to them in his youth in Chicago.
_	With the intention that no mail message could be lost due to unexpected events like I/O failures, resources depletion and unexpected program terminations, the "amavisd" program meticulously checks a completion status of every system call and I/O operation.
_	In Conservative Judaism, the Milah l'Shem giur procedure is also performed for a boy whose mother has not converted, but with the intention that the child be raised Jewish.
_	Team website indicates the intention that the new university should have unique programmes and research priorities enabling it to attract students, academics and researchers nationally and internationally.
_	These are given with the intention that they will be forfeited to the receiver should the donor commit a breach of promise.
_	Genet wrote it on sheets of brown paper which prison authorities provided to prisoners – with the intention that they would make bags of it.
_	In 1989 he donated the villa to Georgetown University with the intention that it should be used as a center of learning and scholarship.
_	Prior to 2009, congregations met three times each week; these meetings were condensed, with the intention that members dedicate an evening for "family worship".
_	Assigned to the German 1st Army, the unit was created with the intention that Hauptmann Oswald Boelcke would be its leader.
_	It may nonetheless sometimes be used with the intention that it be construed as referring to the speaker (as in the case of the "royal "one"" described below), or as referring to the listener.
_	SynbiCITE is funded by government and other partners to run for five years in the first instance, with the intention that it will become self-sustaining by 2018.
_	However, in 2015, Major-General Igor Kozhin, the Commander of the Navy's Air and Air Defence Forces, announced that a second fighter regiment would be formed to augment the current force, with the intention that the MiG-29s be used by this new unit, with some existing Su-33s refurbished for further use.
_	In 1913 it was decided to transfer these lights to Esteiro and Gibalta with the intention that these, together with the nearby Mama lighthouse would mark the channel into Lisbon’s port.
_	In the July 1989 reshuffle Baker was appointed Chairman of the Conservative Party, with the intention that he should organise a fourth consecutive General Election victory for Margaret Thatcher.
_	"Complete trust and "belief"" according to a speech pathologist teaching FC at a autism meeting in Ohio, "with the intention that "together you can show others"".
_	The producers calling the event a Gathering rather than a festival with the intention that the true value of the event is in people coming together.
_	Some songs such as "Ripples..." were written with the intention that Collins could sing them, similar to "More Fool Me" on "Selling England by the Pound", but he did not want to take over as a permanent replacement, opting instead to teach potential lead singers the songs.
_	There are also no sights other than a groove along the top of the slide, emphasizing the intention that the OTs-21 Malysh is limited to very short-range engagements.
_	The organizing committees have published the proceedings of each meeting for the benefit of and reference by the global exploration community, with the intention that each proceeding provides a 10-year perspective of the state of applied geoscience in mineral exploration.
_	Six Brigades of mixed Regular and FCÁ units, each with only one Regular Battalion were established with the intention that the remaining units would be filled by FCÁ personnel upon mobilisation.
_	In the original theatrical release and the Blatty-endorsed DVD, it is the intention that Kane killed himself with the knife.
_	This squadron, temporarily attached to the Grand Fleet from the Battle Cruiser Fleet, was stationed ahead of the main body, with the intention that it join Beatty when the action began.
_	Historically, the courts had been more lenient; while this suggestion first appears in the 14th century, with the intention that legislation was best interpreted by those who had written it, the principle was not strongly followed.
_	In this contractual document of donation ""pro anima"" ("for the sake of the soul"), Silo granted particular properties in the village of "Tabulata" (now Trabada) in "Lucis" (Lugo) to a group of monks, with the intention that they would found a monastery.
_	In 1993, the Peek Whurrong smembers of the Gunditjmara purchased the Deen Maar under the auspices of ATSIC for the Framlingham Aboriginal Trust, with the intention that it become an Indigenous Protected Area (IPA), it was granted this status in 1999.
_	One of Mathews' more unusual ideas, with which he experimented in early 1939, was to stack piles of football-sized concrete spheres on top of air-raid shelters, with the intention that a bomb would expend its energy in scattering aside the heavy spheres rather than breaking the shelter.
_	In the first series, the show was shot with the intention that the episodes could be shown in any order, though Rosen later realised that "this was a show you record and transmit in the same order", comparing the show to a soap opera.
_	When a wicket falls near the end of the day, a lower order (less capable) batsman might be sent in to bat with the intention that the more capable players will be held in reserve until the next morning.
_	Around 3,000 acres were however granted to "courtiers and government officials" with the intention that they exploit the lands for grazing, iron and coal mining and charcoal production.
_	Skydance's David Ellison continues to be involved and is searching for a writer among science fiction authors with the intention that Tim Miller directs it.
_	The scenes where she was shot were filmed at the same time with the intention that they would form the pre-title sequence of "Diamonds Are Forever".
_	During a break for dinner, Fadden was asked to become interim leader as a compromise between the two candidates, with the intention that another leadership election would be held in a few months.
_	In June 2017, Oxford announced that starting the following academic year, history students may choose to sit a take-home exam in some courses, with the intention that this will equalise rates of firsts awarded to women and men at Oxford.
_	The propellers turned in the narrow gap between the two wings, with the intention that the propeller slipstream should enhance the slot effect of the wing pair.
_	The purchase of 173 additional vehicles was with the intention that these new bi-mode trains, similar to the Class 800s, would be used on services into Devon and Cornwall.
_	The council announced that the tower would be leased to the local Hove and Adur Sea Cadets for use as a base, with the intention that access to the camera obscura would be preserved.
_	Max Emanuel of Bavaria sent for his son to come to Brussels with the intention that the States of Flanders would swear an oath on the death of Charles II.
_	As in the Straits Settlements, all foreign coinage was outlawed, with the intention that the new currencies should establish their own market values.
_	Nancy Tellem explained the significance of The Papdits as "It's the first time that, instead of just letting (a pilot die), we're putting something online with the intention that it could reside there and grow there."
_	It was initially the intention that a college is to be established in Delhi in order to take over the degree courses in engineering and technology at the Delhi College of Engineering now the Delhi Technological University and that the college should be developed only for degree courses both on full- time and part-time basis.
_	Bong Bong had been planned as a major town for the county but, as it was flood prone, the New South Wales surveyor-general Thomas Mitchell chose Berrima townsite on the road running south from Sydney to Goulburn with the intention that the town be the chief centre for southern New South Wales.
_	The council, despite the intention that it be a ecumenical council, was marred by what both the Eastern and Western Roman Churches saw as heretical beliefs, and as such both refused to accept the results of the council.
_	It was not the intention that "Endless Orbit SSX" act as a prequel to "Galaxy Express 999" and the 1978 "Space Pirate Captain Harlock" TV series, as both "Galaxy Express" and "SSX" contradict each other, as well as the backstory given in the 1978 "Space Pirate" series.
_	Smeraldo was hired after dal Ponte was imprisoned in 1424 due to failure to repay his debts, with the intention that Smeraldo would manage the logistical aspects of the workshop in addition to his artwork.
_	While in custody, Christopher attempted to arrange a contract killing with another prisoner, with the intention that he would pay $10,000 for the inmate to murder Amy, Amy's brother, and Amy's mother.
_	In this circumstances the Ottoman state led by the Committee of Union and Progress (CUP) organised a congress in Debar in 1909 with the intention that Albanians there declare themselves as Ottomans, promise to defend its territorial sovereignty and adopt an Albanian Arabic character script.
_	An arms embargo was declared with the intention that neither side would make any gains from the truce.
_	It was the intention to resume transportation under new arrangements but that decision was conveyed to the local colonial administrator, William Denison in the following terms: "it is not the intention that transportation should be resumed at the expiration of the two years"; the words "under the present system" were omitted.
_	Robinson was reinstated for the autumn 2008 series, and formality returned to the proceedings; Davies hosted the show again in 2009, with the intention that Robinson would again return when his health permitted.
_	Lower down the dining rooms were fitted out with the intention that the rooms would be visual equivalents of the excellent food served within them.
_	The University's Annual Report of 1949-1950 records the purchase of these houses with grounds of almost , with the intention that they should be incorporated into a large hall of residence.
_	By calling the document the "Grundgesetz", rather than "Verfassung" (constitution), the authors expressed the intention that it would be replaced by a true constitution once Germany was reunited as one state.
_	Six men from Jackson, Missouri incorporated a company on September 29, 1905 to establish a mineral bath spa with the intention that the resort might one day become as famous as Hot Springs, Arkansas.
_	Seeger combined Martí's verse with the tune, with the intention that it be used by the peace movement at the time of the Cuban Missile Crisis.
_	The Council of the IOP, in recommending the purchase of Fulmer to its membership, expressed the intention that, after providing for equipment needs, income from the investment in Fulmer was to be used to support the scientific and educational work of the IOP.
_	On August 8, 2011 President Barack Obama joined Foursquare, with the intention that the staff at the White House would use the service to post tips from places the president has visited.
_	The bunkers were built strong and mobile, with the intention that they could be easily placed by a crane or a helicopter in a previously dug hole.
_	SUSE Linux Enterprise products, including SUSE Linux Enterprise Desktop, receive much more intense testing than the openSUSE community product, with the intention that only mature, stable versions of the included components will make it through to the released enterprise product.
_	Davis instructed Flight 712 to make a left turn, with the intention that the aircraft would land on runway 28L.
_	There are two channels between widely spaced embankments with the intention that flood waters would have space in which to spread while the tide in the estuary prevented free egress.
_	It is the intention that other Flemish media will use the Yellow Book.
_	Dickinson claims that in 1169, Geoffrey granted "to God and St Mary and to Edwy his clerk the chapel of our Lady" which his mother had founded at Walsingham with the intention that Edwy should found a priory.
_	A new, heavier frame was utilized with the intention that the machine could serve as a sidecar hauler.
_	The building was purchased by Shepherd Offshore Ltd in 2012 with the intention that it would be used to house a carriage museum.
_	In 1964, he founded the Bihar School of Yoga (BSY) at Munger, with the intention that it would act as a centre of training for future teachers of yoga as well as offer courses on yoga.
_	Constructive trusts also arise with mutual wills; wills created by two or more people at the same time, with the intention that the wills are completely binding.
_	Feijoo saw the necessity of writing to move Spain away from its delay; with this intention, he gave a didactic character to his work, noticeably catholic, but with the intention that the new European currents penetrated, at least, in the illustrated classes.
_	The 2015 Strategic Defence and Security Review announced that the Sentinel R1 would remain in service "until the next decade" with the intention that it be withdrawn by 2025.
_	A $9 million low interest loan from the department's infrastructure trust program was made with the intention that in the future, as funding permits, additional grants for re-payment would be made.
_	The appointment took place with the intention that the Gerichtsassessor would be employed later in his lifetime as a judge.
_	The Quebec team had affiliated with the Fédération de soccer du Québec, with the intention that the FSQ eventually apply for membership of CONCACAF.
_	Larimer chose the name "Denver City" to honor the governor of the Kansas Territory, James W. Denver, with the intention that the city would become the county seat of Arapaho County.
_	Her timbers and fittings were initially preserved with the intention that she be rebuilt and returned to active service, but this work was postponed by other demands.
_	Learning of Vincent's upcoming wedding party after Kate makes contact with Manon at a beach party, Richard and Kate enlist their friends Jerry and Penelope to help them impersonate a group of Texans attending the party, with the intention that they will infiltrate the party and switch the diamond for a fake, also passing on the diamond to Jerry and Penelope so that they will not be suspected.
_	The Professor created Cubert with the intention that he would continue his work after discovering that his life was wasted with nothing but failed or worthless inventions.
_	One of Ritual's main design goals with "SiN Episodes" was to offer interactivity, character-driven gameplay, emergent AI, and a plot reflecting the choices made by players through an opt-in statistics system that aggregates play data to a database: the intention that future episodes would thus depend on the choices that are made by each player.
_	The idea for such a self-sufficient community originated when Eleanor Roosevelt learned through her friend, journalist Lorena Hickok, of a plan to relocate a group of West Virginia coal miners to a nearby farm with the intention that they could combine subsistence farming with simple industries to reclaim their economic footing.
_	A city stadium was considered in 1955, with the intention that it could function as host for the 1962 FIFA World Cup in Chile.
_	The songs "Joe's Garage" and "Catholic Girls" were recorded with the intention that Zappa would release them as a single.
_	The "New City" was designated by the Polish government in 1950 and deliberately located near to Katowice with the intention that it would not be a self-sustaining city.
_	It had always been the intention that the aircraft would carry only two people on the Tasman flight.
_	The aim of this day is to organize activities related to Jewish culture and expose them to the public, with the intention that it would reveal the cultural and historical heritage of the Jewish people.
_	Leontyne Price's original storybook version of the show had first been acquired by Disney with the intention that it should become an animated film, but it was never made.
_	In 1878, von Massow added a prayer society, the "Gebetsverein", which prayed a number of prayers (including "Veni Creator Spiritus" by Rabanus Maurus) "with the intention that all may be one".
_	The album declares itself TMBG's first album "for the entire family", with the intention that songs appeal to both young and old audiences.
_	With the intention that it will be their last performance, the band, in full uniform, and wearing their miners' helmets and lamps, plays "Danny Boy" late at night outside the hospital.
_	The United States Capitol was constructed with the intention that it house the tomb of George Washington and contains a crypt and burial chamber directly below its rotunda.
_	Dylan was delisted, and picked up by the Carlton Football Club with the first pick in the pre-season draft, at the end of the 2005 season, with the intention that he would fill the back-up ruck position behind Barnaby French.
_	Each case depends upon its own facts, however a guiding test, is whether a chattel has been fixed with the intention that it shall remain in position 'permanently or for an indefinite or substantial period', or only for some temporary purpose.
_	On April 14, Tyler Bates announced that he had amicably retired from the band's touring line-up, stating that he helped put the band together with the intention that it could function without him when "pre-existing commitments in the film and television industry would be too demanding to handle responsibly from the road".
_	The Higgs Charitable trust was formed with the intention that it should fund the TWJ.
_	In 2011 the Minister for the Environment Nick Smith announced that the government would introduce a Freedom Camping Bill into Parliament with the intention that the law will be in place before the Rugby World Cup.
_	In April 2013, the structure was moved from its Main Street location, with the intention that it will be restored and reopened in a different location.
_	It was built in 756 or 1355 C.E., six years after the Mosque by Shaykhu with the intention that it would serve as both a madrasa, a school, and a khanqah, a Sufi monastery.
_	The building is now being restored with the intention that it should become a local museum.
_	The game's melodies were created with the intention that short segments of music could be endlessly repeated during the same gameplay without causing boredom.
_	It was the intention that Prinair would have been one of the launch customers of the CASA CN-235 and at the roll-out of the new aircraft in September 1983 the prototype was actually painted in Prinair colors (right side only).
_	In addition to Beethoven, pieces such as "Meryton Townhall" and "The Militia Marches In" (featuring the flute) were inspired by the film's period, with the intention that they could conceivably have been heard during that time.
_	Over the Admiralty's objections, Curtin appointed Collins to replace Crutchley as Commander, Task Force 44, in June 1944, at the rank of commodore, with the intention that Collins would replace Royle when his term expired.
_	A Garford bus was purchased from New Zealand Farmers Co-op in June 1920 with the intention that it would replace the Walker electric bus on the Templeton service.
_	It was the intention that these conversions would replace the Class K, 2-4-0 locomotives but with their steaming problems the Ks were still in service long after the last D had been relegated to minor duties or even the scrapheap.
_	When restoration of the Freighter proved to be beyond this individual's resources he donated the vehicle to the East Anglia Transport Museum near Lowestoft with the intention that the Museum should undertake the restoration.
_	It was given the status of Regent's Commissariat ("Kormányzói Biztosság") with the intention that it would be governed by the Ruthenian minority population.
_	The band was formed with Yusuke Chiba as the leader, but with the intention that all the members would contribute to the songwriting process.
_	These were procured to replace the Sea Vixen then in service in the role, with the intention that they operate from the decks of four brand new or modernised aircraft carriers.
_	During February 19 to 20 in Milan, to mark the 10th anniversary of the founding of the School, the "First National Conference of Mystical Fascists" was held in a room at the palazzo Marino (Marino Palace), with the intention that it would be the first in a series of such conferences.
_	Treitel defines an offer as "an expression of willingness to contract on certain terms, made with the intention that it shall become binding as soon as it is accepted by the person to whom it is addressed", the "offeree".
_	Eurostar (at the time European Passenger Services) had 12 locomotives modified (all ex-37/5) as Class 37/6, with the intention that they would haul overnight international trains ("Nightstar") over the non-electrified sections of their routes in Britain.
_	In May 1960, the British Government stated that it would be prepared to grant independence to the then protectorate of British Somaliland, with the intention that the territory would unite with the Italian-administered Trust Territory of Somaliland (the former Italian Somaliland).
_	George Franchere, the last descendent of that Mabee line to own the House and property, donated the site to the Schenectady County Historical Society, with the intention that it would be maintained as a museum and educational center.
_	In support of this plan, the French squadron based at Rochefort put to sea in July 1805, initially with the intention that they would join the Atlantic Fleet from Brest.
_	After undertaking training in Copenhagen for DFDS Seaways, she had the intention that she would work in the industry for several years before starting a family.
_	It was the intention that the line made an end-on junction with the Chemin de fer Aigle-Ollon-Monthey railway and that they open on the same date offering a service, with a change of train, between Aigle and Champery.
_	All of the components that had been assembled for the production of the main F-111K fleet that shared commonality were diverted to the FB-111A program, while the two aircraft under construction were re-designated as YF-111As with the intention that they be used as test aircraft in the F-111A program.
_	The mandala is based on the Five Buddha Families with the intention that the organisation addresses needs in all aspects of life.
_	In 2006, No. 1A Royal Crescent was purchased by the Brownsword Charitable Foundation with the intention that it should be reunited with No. 1, thereby allowing Bath Preservation Trust to return the house as far as possible to its original architectural state and to extend its operation as an historic house museum with improved educational and visitor facilities and an additional dedicated exhibition space.
_	This obelisk was sited on the summit of Worvas hill (now known as "Knill's Monument", or "The Steeple") with views over St Ives Bay, with the intention that he should be buried in a vault within it, but his body was interred in St Andrew's Church, Holborn.
_	In a marketing seeding program, a company offers some sort of promotion (free product, discounts, service trials, etc.) to a niche group of people with the intention that this would stimulate WOM.
_	The bracelets were first created in May 1970 by a California student group called "Voices in Vital America" (VIVA), with the intention that American Prisoners Of War in Vietnam not be forgotten.
_	It is the intention that the results of their activities may encourage the recruitment and retention of professional observers and foster the best quality observer data for the purposes of conservation and the responsible management of marine living resources.
_	There is a real sense of competition and belonging, fostered by the fortnightly House meetings; it is certainly the intention that every student finds an opening in House events, whether in something in which they have already enjoyed success, or taking the plunge in an entirely new activity.
_	Also, there were film companies that could not afford to make sound films, and would make films with the intention that they would be dubbed at screenings by live performers reading from a script.
_	Commander Raydor originally joined the police force as a way to put her husband through law school, with the intention that he would reciprocate.
_	The Army lobby against the special forces prevailed however, with these units ceasing to be raised in 1962, with the intention that all normal "caçadores" units would receive the same training as the disbanded special "caçadores".
_	Eventually the compromise was reached that the Governor-General would have official residences in both Sydney and Melbourne with the intention that the Melbourne Government House would be used when parliament was sitting and that the Sydney Government House would be used when the parliament was not sitting.
_	So named by the NZGSAE 1957-58, because of the proximity of this group to the Admiralty Mountains, and with the intention that many of the topographic features would be named for celebrated victories, especially naval victories.
_	In 1984, the Labor Hawke Government introduced public funding for political parties, with the intention that it would reduce the parties' reliance on corporate donations.
_	In his teens, he performed with the Ethix, who played R&B music in clubs around San Francisco and in Las Vegas, and released one experimental and wildly atonal single, "Bad Trip", in 1967, with the intention that the record could be played at any speed.
_	A number of campaigns have begun to raise the profile and safety of the park with the intention that it recaptures its original charm and once again becomes a place for friends, families, and visitors to enjoy.
_	In 1919, when the now-famous Bauhaus school of art and design began in nearby Weimar, its founder Walter Gropius established a workshop in production pottery, with the intention that it would be taught at a factory in Weimar.
_	The CCA has left its research, archives and ongoing projects in the hands of a volunteer trustee board, with the intention that another cultural or academic organization will be able to continue its work in future.
_	A headquarters was opened in January 1950 in the Eckermann Implement building in downtown Eldridge, with the intention that it would serve the bookmobile.
_	Nevertheless, theorems are usually expressed in natural language rather than in a completely symbolic form, with the intention that the reader can produce a formal statement from the informal one.
_	FPVS aims to expand and improve the water infrastructure and sewer networks in the Cuartel V district (with a pilot project involving approximately 750 homes), with the intention that it will be replicated in similar areas.
_	It was technically not a crown corporation as it was intended to generate a profit and was created with the intention that, eventually, the government would own no more than 10% of its holdings; it did not require approvals of the Governor-in-Council for its activities and did not report to parliament.
_	She was designed and built with the intention that Aldrich would make her available to the U.S. Navy for war service.
_	The Duke stated he was invited by President al-Assad with the intention that Duarte Pio relay the Syrian head of state's plans and intents for Syria and its people.
_	It is the intention that the talk about the type of sin, and the previously made announcement of reproof, should allow other congregation members to interpret what type of sin had been committed.
_	The remains of Cornelis Kok II (1778-1858) were exhumed from a grave, which was threatened by agricultural encroachment, on 19 April 1961, with the intention that the remains should be reburied at the historic precinct near the mission church.
_	All the articles called, in Greek, parapherna, when they are given by a wife to her husband with the intention that he shall have control of them as long as the marriage lasts, he has the right to keep, just as those which are given him by way of dowry.
_	In 1972 a proposal to convert the house into an Arts Centre with an additional theatre was agreed, with the intention that the immediate surrounding gardens, lawns, trees and two lakes would be preserved.
_	He lived in the house until his death in 1927, and his widow Amy remained there until 1935, when she sold it to Hazel Grove and Bramhall Urban District Council for £14,360 (worth about £ in ) with the intention that the house and park be open to the public.
_	The Company's charter was otherwise made extremely equivocal with the intention that this would allow it to operate freely and independently, and to govern and develop its acquired territories while also turning a profit.
_	In 2006 he was returned to Ireland, with the intention that he would stand at the Coolagown Stud in County Cork.
_	The FIH implemented a two-year rules cycle with the 2007–08 edition of the rules, with the intention that the rules be reviewed on a biennial basis.
_	For his stud career, Manna was syndicated ("turned into limited liablility company") by his owner, with the intention that his future should be managed on "efficient business lines".
_	A later investigation by the Canadian Broadcast Standards Council's Atlantic Regional Panel revealed that the "9" had been located in a storage locker at the aforementioned self-storage facility (without the knowledge of that facility, presumably to ensure that employees of that facility could not gain an unfair advantage), with the intention that the clues would allow a listener to access that locker and retrieve the object.
_	As explained on the inside of the booklet: "the remixes presented here... have been mixed the intention that each of the artists involved place their own personal musical interpretation on the chosen song and mix it accordingly".
_	Studio scenes, helicopter shots, and CGI were forged together in the hovering sequences with the intention that the viewer should be unable to determine which is which.
_	These were incorporated with the intention that two rows of bales could be placed between each window, leaving a well-lighted passage between each double row of bales.
_	May announced the abolition of the UK Border Agency on 26 March 2013, with the intention that its work would be returned to the Home Office.
_	GS moved Ong from Singapore to Beijing with the intention that he would also become CEO of their Beijing joint venture Goldman Sachs Gao Hua Securities, Co. However, Ong's weak knowledge of written Chinese led him to fail a language ability examination required to take up his new position.
_	The quarterdeck was lengthened from the original plans in order to incorporate a mizzen mast, with the intention that the additional sails would enhance speed and maneuverability compared to the traditional two-masted snow rig sloop.
_	"The Last Supper" was commissioned by Ludovico Sforza, Duke of Milan in 1495, as part of a series of renovations to the convent with the intention that the location would become the Sforza family mausoleum.
_	Although White wrote the song with the intention that Zombies' lead singer Colin Blunstone would sing it, White ended up singing the song because his weak trembley voice better suited the song.
_	In many villages, farmers were either forced or strongly encouraged to tear down their homes and rebuild them in the middle of their new fields with the intention that this would give them easier access to every part of the field, enabling them to utilize the land more effectively.
_	Thus, in 1796 and 1800, the Federalist party fielded two presidential candidates, Adams and Thomas Pinckney in 1796 and Adams and Charles Cotesworth Pinckney in 1800, with the intention that Adams be elected president and either Pinckney be elected vice president.
_	The same impetus to establish endowed prayer also led to many new collegiate foundations in this later period; under which an existing parish church would be rebuilt to accommodate a new chantry college; commonly with the intention that the rectory of the parish should be appropriated to support the new foundation.
_	Part of Alberni's mission in California was to establish a new civilian settlement called the Villa de Branciforte, which was established in 1797, with the intention that the community would be settled by retired Catalan Volunteers.
_	Behring pledged $20 million to the Smithsonian Institution's National Museum of Natural History in 1997, with the intention that it be used for educational purposes.
_	This two-lane road was constructed in the early 1970s as the northbound lanes of a motorway, with the intention that separate southbound lanes would be constructed in the future.
_	He gave the manuscript to the poet Thomas Moore, who in turn sold it to John Murray with the intention that it should eventually be published.
_	In 2002, the National Capital Planning Commission invited several prominent landscape architects to submit proposals for the redesign of Pennsylvania Avenue at the White House, with the intention that the security measures would be woven into an overall plan for the precinct and a more welcoming public space might be created.
_	Dr Aldridge and his family lived in the house and it was the intention that they should mix freely with the patients and dine with them, and various forms of recreation were provided for the patients.
_	The Ottoman state organised a congress in Debar (1909) with the intention that Albanians there declare themselves as Ottomans, promise to defend its territorial sovereignty and adopt an Albanian Arabic character alphabet.
_	A proprietary chapel is a chapel that originally belonged to a private person, but with the intention that it would be open to the public, rather than restricted (as with private chapels in the stricter sense) to members of a family or household, or members of an institution.
_	In February 2015, a vast renovation plan was unveiled with the intention that the completion of the project coincide with the stadium's 50th anniversary and with Club América's centenary in 2016, as well as the construction of a commercial hub outside the stadium to be completed some time in 2019.
_	Section 13 makes it an offence to manufacture, supply or possess a surveillance device with the intention that it be used contrary to the Act.
_	The king's assistant, Charles-Claude Flahaut de la Billaderie, commissioned "Oath of the Horatii" with the intention that it be an allegory about loyalty to the state and therefore to the king.
_	The Archepiscopacies of Hamburg and Bremen had been established with the intention that they would serve as bases for missions in northern and eastern Europe.
_	At the suggestion of Assistant Secretary of the Navy (and future President of the United States) Franklin D. Roosevelt (1882–1945), R. E. Tod of New York City, seeking a way to contribute to the U.S. war effort during World War I, contracted with the Herreshoff Manufacturing Company at Bristol, Rhode Island, for one of a small group of 60-ton steel-hulled steam-powered boats built to a naval patrol boat design for private owners with the intention that they would be made available to the U.S. Navy in time of war.
_	While fixed consists such as the Union Pacific Railroad's M-10000 were out (the last, the Illinois Central 121, had been built in 1936), railroads still ordered sets of equipment with the intention that those sets stay with a particular train.
_	Human branding or stigmatizing is the process which a mark, usually a symbol or ornamental pattern, is burned into the skin of a living person, with the intention that the resulting scar makes it permanent.
_	The station opened on 2 March 1874 with the intention that it be used as a terminus for main line and continental trains: these services were intended to operate to both the City of London and the West End of London.
_	The Chertsey and Christchurch sites were among those allocated to Qinetiq when DERA was broken up in 2001 with the intention that Qinetiq would be privatised, which happened in 2006.
_	From 2015, legislation came into force such that a new utility company, Irish Water, became responsible for providing water and wastewater services, with the intention that the company would be funded through direct billing.
_	A joint work is defined in Section 101 of the U.S. Copyright Act as ""a work prepared by two or more authors with the intention that their contributions be merged into inseparable or interdependent parts of a unitary whole"".
_	Therefore, while the message was unequivocally that Compulsory Competitive Tendering was to be withdrawn, the replacement was to be less prescribed, with the intention that local authorities follow a responsive and locally determined method of service provision within a centrally defined framework.
_	The Court found that the claim need not be presented directly to the government, but that the false statement must be made with the intention that it will be relied upon by the government in paying, or approving payment of, a claim.
_	Jacques wrote all the lyrics for the songs with the intention that they would complement the on-screen action but still be appealing to someone who had never played the game.
_	The air assault battalion will be reduced to company strength, with the intention that it is assigned as a permanent public duties unit in Scotland.
_	– Separation of UNAN in two campus: UNAN-León and UNAN-Managua with the intention that both campuses would be autonomous.
_	This is an assessment of the prescribing skills of final-year medical students with the intention that it ‘allows all students to demonstrate their competencies in relation to the safe and effective use of medicines’.
_	During that same year, the local jurisdictions of Fairfax County, Arlington County, and the cities of Alexandria and Falls Church agreed to appropriate $3 million to purchase land adjacent to Mason to provide for a Fairfax Campus with the intention that the institution would expand into a regional university of major proportions, including the granting of graduate degrees.
_	She was sold again in February 1985 to the China United Shipbuilding Company for A$1.4 million, with the intention that she be towed to China and broken up for scrap.
_	It was the intention that trainer Louis van Gaal would take over this position afterwards and Sturkenboom would head up the operational Ajax-organisation.
_	Inherited bus fleets were initially left in their original colours with First fleet names, with the intention that the Barbie scheme would stand for a set service quality.
_	In 1873, Owen launched a new paper, the "Labour Press, Miners' and Workmen's Examiner", with the intention that this would provide much of the material for a series of local labour newspapers around the country.
_	In 2008 almost all properties comprising the town were purchased by the new mine operators with the intention that they be demolished as the open cut mine expands into the town site.
_	The Mariner Jupiter-Saturn program proposed two Mariner-derived probes that would perform a scaled back mission involving flybys of only the two gas giants, though designers at JPL built the craft with the intention that further encounters past Saturn would be an option.
_	In 2010, Constable Billy Gossen designed the RCMP Memorial Hockey Stick with the intention that it would be used to generate funds for the National Remembrance Fund.
_	A thorough investigation by the Indiana Historical Bureau into the history of the seal led to the discovery that original seal was created with the intention that the sun should, in fact, be depicted as rising.
_	On Tuesday 4 April 1866, Lloyd chaired a penny reading meeting at Church Gresley, with the intention that the literate would entertain the rural poor with improving readings and songs; for example Tennyson's poem "Dora" was read and well received.
_	The VELA was designed and built with the intention that it would be used in schools and Universities to monitor Physics and Chemistry experiments as it could be attached to all manner or analogue probes and sensors such as pH meters, temperature sensors, light gates, Signal generator and microphones.
_	Act of 1818 provided the arming of a vessel with the intention that it be employed against a people at peace with the United States.
_	New characters were introduced in the second volume with the intention that they would become regular cast members and receive more character development in future issues.
_	A Human Genetic Archive is sent to the Cloud Ark, with the intention that it will be used to rebuild the human population.
_	Article 2.1 defines the crime of terrorist financing as the offense committed by "any person" who "by any means, directly or indirectly, unlawfully and willfully, provides or collects funds with the intention that they should be used or in the knowledge that they are to be used, in full or in part, in order to carry out" an act "intended to cause death or serious bodily injury to a civilian, or to any other person not taking an active part in the hostilities in a situation of armed conflict, when the purpose of such act, by its nature or context, is to intimidate a population, or to compel a government or an international organization to do or to abstain from doing any act."
_	At the time, this was a standard publication method for Marvel UK, with the intention that "Overkill" would be better suited to the UK market, whereas the 'standard' Marvel format would be better suited to comic shops in other countries.
_	The stage group is adopted with the intention that categories within each group are more or less homogeneous in respect of survival, and that the survival rates are distinctive between groups.
_	In June 2014, staff of existing Probation Trusts were allocated either the new National Probation Service, or else to the notional CRC that was to assume control of offenders in the Trust area, with the intention that staff allocated to CRCs would be transferred (TUPed) across to actual CRCs upon their formation.
_	It was planned as a "Permanent" Royal Ordnance Factory with the intention that it, unlike some other similar facilities, would remain open for production after the end of World War II; and, together with ROF Bridgend (Filling Factory No. 2), would replace the Royal Filling Factory located at the Royal Arsenal, Woolwich.
_	Military units which contain assault troops are typically organized for mobility with the intention that they will penetrate enemy defences and attack into the enemy's vulnerable rear areas.
_	Hall prepared two notebooks of his case notes with the intention that they be published.
_	In an interview in "Doctor Who Magazine", Russell T Davies stated that an alternate ending for this episode was written and filmed, with the intention that it would be shown to press previewers to hide the secret of the regeneration.
_	The truce was designed to last 28 days and an arms embargo was declared with the intention that neither side would make any gains from the truce.
_	In 1995 Brown gave his New Buffalo property to SAIC with the intention that it serve as a retreat for SAIC faculty and staff.
_	Meidner established a study committee that came up with a 1976 proposal that entailed transferring the excess profits into investment funds controlled by the workers in the efficient firms, with the intention that firms would create further employment and pay more workers higher wages, rather than increasing the wealth of company owners and managers.
_	Following the end of the war in October 1902, "Britannic" was released from government service and returned to White Star who sent her to her builders in Belfast for a survey, with the intention that she might be refurbished and modernised for further use.
_	All programmes still made in standard-definition were upscaled on the channel, with the intention that by 2012 the vast majority of the channel's output would be in high-definition.
_	He donated the land for the Wesleyan church with the intention that, when it was built, it was to initially be used as a school.
_	In 1948, the IMC was revived on a more formal basis by Perrott, Joss Lynam, and others, with the intention that it become a national club drawing its membership from all around Ireland, with local branches in the major cities.
_	As of 2014 the building had been empty for some time and the university had sold it on a long lease with the intention that it would be converted into student accommodation and commercial/office space.
_	At the age of six, she was legally adopted by her grandmother, Princess Abigail Campbell Kawānanakoa, in the Hawaiian tradition of "hānai" with the intention that she remain a direct heir to a possible restoration of the kingdom.
_	Lewis then accepted $4 million from Don King to step aside and allow Tyson to fight Bruce Seldon for an expected $30 million instead with the intention that if Tyson defeated Seldon, he would fight Lewis next.
_	At the 17 May 2002 general election, electronic voting machines were used in three of 42 constituencies (Dublin North, Dublin West and Meath) on a trial basis, with the intention that it would be extended to the whole country for future elections.
_	These new satellites were created with the intention that they would replace the Hotel Series, as well as function as the satellites that would complete the objectives of the Vela Sierra subset.
_	The ship was designed to be the flagship of the North British Steam Packet Co. fleet with the intention that it could be used for regular
_	The sale of the building in 1947 reflected the intention that new premises would soon be provided for the Museum and the Art Gallery; planning began in 1951, but then dragged on for the next twenty years, during which time the old buildings received minimal attention, other than the insertion of mezzanines to gain additional space.
_	Intel introduced protected mode into the x86 family with the intention that operating systems which used it would run entirely in the new mode and that all programs running under a protected mode operating system would run in protected mode as well.
_	As Education Secretary, he had repeatedly expressed the intention that, were he to become Home Secretary, he would make the then-incumbent Jack Straw, who had been criticised for being hard-line, seem over-liberal.
_	Despite the intention that Braham would publicise the songs there seems to be no record of his ever having performed them.
_	Gospel Magic is intended to present the Christian good news through "visual parables"; the trick or illusion is used to present theological points in an entertaining way with the intention that people will remember the message.
_	Larimer chose the name "Denver" to honor the current territorial governor with the intention that the city would be chosen as the county seat of Arapaho County.
_	It was designed by George Wilkinson, the Poor Law Commissioners' architect, and was based on one of his standard plans, with the intention that it accommodate 700 people.
_	In 1875, it was removed during alterations in the square by Thomas Blackwell, of Crosse & Blackwell, the condiment firm (who had premises at 20-21 Soho Square from the late 1830s until the early 1920s), who gave it for safekeeping to his friend, artist Frederick Goodall, with the intention that it might be restored.
_	To set up passenger vehicles assembly plants, the country went into negotiations with Peugeot of France and Volkswagen AG of Germany, the government also had in mind a medium term outlook of the provision of technical assistance to develop local content inputs with the intention that by 1990, the vehicles manufactured will have 100% input sourced locally.
_	Pronouncing the judgment, Justice Altamas Kabir said: "It is no doubt true that the legislature had in its wisdom stipulated a cooling period of six months from the date of filing of a petition for mutual divorce till such divorce is actually granted, with the intention that it would save the institution of marriage.
_	Benoit threw Sabu with the intention that he would take a flapjack bump but Brunk attempted to turn mid-air and take a back body drop bump instead, which he was not able to do and landed on his head causing the injury.
_	The then Home Secretary, Theresa May, announced the abolition of the UK Border Agency on 26 March 2013, with the intention that its work would be returned to the Home Office.
_	The abbey was founded in 1138 by Ulrich II, Bishop of Constanz as a private episcopal monastery, with the intention that it should offer shelter and hospitality to pilgrims on their way from Constanz to Einsiedeln Abbey.
_	The San Francisco 49ers selected Lawson in the 2006 NFL Draft with the intention that he could bring pressure off the edges as the 49ers defense transitioned from a 4-3 defense to a 3-4.
_	The title refers to the points of the flint, and the intention that the sculpture would be effective in three orientations.
_	It is the intention that a planning application will be submitted early in 2011.
_	It was given a shark-like design, with the intention that it would "snap out" like a shark.
_	The Quebec team had affiliated with the Fédération de soccer du Québec, with the intention that the FSQ eventually apply for membership of CONCACAF.
_	As part of their collaboration Adidas and Parley For The Oceans held the "Run for the Oceans" event in summer of 2017, with the intention that this would raise awareness of their products as well as ocean conservation.
_	This can be a problem if an answering machine is used on a line with a 1571 service (which cannot be temporarily disabled), with the intention that messages will be recorded on the machine; it is necessary to ensure that the machine answers before 1571 does.
_	In August 1915, the railway extended the tracks up the canyon through Upper Rochester to reach the mine at the end of the canyon, with the intention that the ore could be hauled down to the milling operations in Lower Rochester.
_	UHRC implements demonstration programs among slum-dwelling populations in cities (Indore, Agra, and more recently North-East Delhi) with the intention that they be adapted, replicated and up-scaled by other government and non-government agencies.
_	They responded to the problem by passing legislation to establish the Bank of Indiana with the intention that the bank would be able to issue paper money and help to finance the state's debt.
_	The Surrey and Sussex Junction Railway was an abortive railway scheme which obtained powers in July 1865 to build a line from Croydon to Tunbridge Wells, via Oxted with the intention that it should be worked by the London Brighton and South Coast Railway (LB&SCR).
_	She states that in the morning she and her husband will take the children into the thickest part of the forest and leave them there, with the intention that they won’t be able to find their way back, and end up starving to death.
_	Skydance's David Ellison continues to be involved and is searching for a writer among science fiction authors with the intention that Tim Miller directs it.
_	Much of the route follows a historic rail line known as the Michigan Air Line Railroad, which began in 1869 with the intention that it would be a new route from Chicago to Port Huron.
_	The family had relations in northern France who were also in the lace-making business and in 1889 Knight was sent to them with the intention that she would eventually study art at a Parisian atelier.
_	Berry Gordy wrote "Do You Love Me" with the intention that The Temptations, who had no Top 40 hits to their name yet, would record it.
_	General Alexandre de Beauharnais decided to put Tarrare's abilities to military use, and he was employed as a courier by the French army, with the intention that he would swallow documents, pass through enemy lines, and recover them from his stool once safely at his destination.
_	Construction took place between 402 and 397 BC, with the intention that the fortress would protect the city from siege and attack by the Carthaginians.
_	Initial shares were sold for US$20 with the intention that after the cemetery was laid out that each share would be exchanged for 12 grave lots.
_	In 1954 it was purchased by J.D. Rockefeller Jr. from the Baron Maurice Rothschild with the intention that it be given to the Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York.
_	On 16 May 1907 an extension of the pier measuring was opened, with the intention that the pier would be used as a docking point for boats to Cardiff.
_	Sauron forged the One Ring in secret, with the intention that it would be a "master ring" and give him control over all the other rings, but was not completely successful in this aim.
_	Furthermore, (ii) can be divided into: (a) it was meant to express the intention that the work should last for all time (proposed by Keichū, and supported by , , Yoshio Yamada, and ); (b) it was meant to wish for long life for the emperor and empress (Shinobu Origuchi); and (c) it was meant to indicate that the collection included poems from all ages (proposed by Yamada).
_	In terms of gameplay, Aqua was designed to be a character gamers would take some getting used to, and recommended them use her as the last one in order to understand the game's story better, pointing out the intention that Aqua would be the last character to leave the Land of Departure in her scenario.
_	According to some sources, the honeymoon is a relic of marriage by capture, based on the practice of the husband going into hiding with his wife to avoid reprisals from her relatives, with the intention that the woman would be pregnant by the end of the month.
_	Adoption as an OMG specification carries the intention that the Business Motivation Model would, in time, be submitted to the International Organization for Standardization (ISO) as a standard.
_	In April 2015 Clarke was nominated as the ECB's first president, with the intention that president's primary role would be to represent ECB on the International Cricket Council's executive board.
_	At the 2008 General Convention, the delegates elected three suffragan bishops with the intention that they would serve the UECNA and also assist the ACC and APCK when requested.
_	The probes would be built by JPL, with the intention that they would last long enough to complete the original Grand Tour of the four giant planets, but be advertised as missions to only Jupiter and Saturn to reduce estimated total project costs.
_	The new system was implemented to reduce the format's card pool, with the intention that this would make the format more understandable and attractive to play.
_	April, a letter listing the mutineers demands was presented to the captain with the intention that it be forwarded to the Naval Board.
_	It was the intention that it would feature lots of music and various sound-processing techniques during the course of telling the story.
_	His lack of academic aptitude meant that he was not sent to Eton with his older brother, but rather to Radley, with the intention that he should enter the army.
_	These setbacks prompted General MacArthur to consider using nuclear weapons against the Chinese or North Korean interiors, with the intention that radioactive fallout zones would interrupt the Chinese supply chains.
_	The Prince Regent, soon to become George IV, had the vase completed by the sculptor Richard Westmacott with the intention that it be the focal point of the new Waterloo chamber at Windsor Castle, commemorating the Battle of Waterloo, one of numerous triumphal commissions for Westmacott after Waterloo.
_	In early July 1917, the British Cabinet accepted the recommendation, with the intention that the majority of the new squadrons planned to be equipped with bombers.
_	It had been raised to county status by George of Poděbrady, with the intention that it would serve as a territory for his descendants.
_	In March 2007, "Starscape" was available free, with the intention that all material will be fully released online.
_	Tunnerminnerwait and Planobeena were among sixteen Tasmanian Aborigines whom George Robinson brought to Melbourne in 1839 with the intention that they would help to ‘civilise’ the Victorian ‘blacks’ when he became Chief Protector of Aborigines at Port Phillip.
_	While from a Catholic viewpoint there have been tensions concerning some developments of the practice, the pope said, there is no denying the goodness of the intention that inspired its defence, which was to stress that man is offered the concrete possibility of uniting himself in his inner heart with God in that profound union of grace known as "theosis", divinization.
_	Eton has also announced plans to increase the figure to around 320 pupils, with 70 educated free of charge, with the intention that the number of pupils receiving financial assistance from the school continues to increase.
_	The Weardale Railway preservation project was founded in 1993, with the intention that a private company should take ownership of the line and start a steam service for tourists on the scenic western section.
_	The unique philosophy of the kollel, in which members are subsisting entirely on support from others, is part of an overall philosophy of some Orthodox Jews, that God desires that the children of Israel primarily occupy themselves in this world with the study of His Torah, and gave certain Jews more of a propensity to work with the intention that they should support the 'learners'.
_	In 2014 the 11th Airmobile Brigade, was integrated into the Rapid Forces Division "(Division Schnelle Kräfte)", while the 43rd Mechanized Brigade began integration into the 1st Panzer Division "(1. Panzerdivision)" in 2016, with the intention that it is fully part of the German formation by the end of 2019.
_	The property was purchased in 1993 by ATSIC for the Framlingham Aboriginal Trust with the intention that it become an Indigenous Protected Area (IPA), it was granted this status in 1999.
_	An estate owner could claim a laborer as a "colonus adscripticius" with the intention that this person would provide him services.
_	These distort the control points which define the outline, with the intention that the rasterizer produce fewer undesirable features on the glyph.
_	With these new Duplo sets, Lego began targeting children 1½ years old with the intention that when the children became older, their Duplo bricks could be used together with regular Lego bricks.
_	PIPCU maintains an 'Infringing Website List' (IWL), a portal for digital advertisers to be informed of sites containing infringing content with the intention that they cease advertising on them.
_	In 1935, at Frieda's request, his remains were exhumed and then cremated and his ashes were brought to the ranch by Angelo Ravagli (Frieda's lover and the man who became her third husband in 1934) with the intention that they be buried there.
_	Despite the intention that these dwellings would be a strictly temporary measure, many remained inhabited for years and even decades after the end of the war.
_	More than 159,737 signatures have been gathered globally with the intention that Chuck Rosenberg will be fired or forced to resign as head of DEA.
_	The rest was a personal services contract with the intention that Ismail would become an ambassador for Canadian football.
_	Sometimes it is used seriously, but more often it is used humorously, with the intention that it be recognized as both hackneyed and outdated.
_	After the end of the First World War, a campaign was started in 1919 to raise £20,000 to build a war memorial in Oldham, and to endow educational scholarships for the children who lost a father, with the intention that any excess funds would be paid to Oldham Royal Infirmary (the hospital closed in 1989, and merged with Royal Oldham Hospital, its site later becoming the home for Oldham Sixth Form College).
_	Given its heritage, MCC continues to participate in the administration of English cricket, and in 2010 offered Lord's as a neutral venue for Pakistan to stage a "home" Test match, as scheduled by the ICC, versus Australia; the club's initial offering was made with the intention that Pakistan, whose terrorist-stricken country had rendered it a no-go area for international cricket, could remain within the international cricketing fold.
_	In addition to its primary functions, the building is slated to include a significant amount of retail as well as a wide variety of other unique amenities with the intention that it functions as a nearly self-sustaining entity, approaching the concept of a "vertical city".
_	In the event of a Team 7 member's death, his clones are released in a simulated environment with the intention that only one survive to act as the member's replacement.
_	As part of the operations, Dornier Do 24 flying boats were modified and loaded with explosives, with the intention that they would be landed on the Vistula River and exploded against river bridges used by Soviet forces.
_	Its goal is to generate and promote cultural and artistic activities with reference to the oeuvre of Vincent van Gogh as related to the time he spent in Arles, and the intention that van Gogh expressed in establishing an international center of artistic creation and exchange in Arles.
_	The Sacred Heart R.C. school in the neighbouring village of Byermoor was also under threat of closure, with the intention that the pupils would join those from Marley Hill at other schools in the area, mainly Clover Hill and Washingwell primaries in Whickham, although this decision was subsequently reversed.
_	The objective is to start a regular "Bible study" with any person who is not already a member, with the intention that the student be baptized as a member of the group; Witnesses are advised to consider discontinuing Bible studies with students who show no interest in becoming members.
_	The name is derived from the Alfred Lord Tennyson poem "The Brook", whose lines "For men may come and men may go, but I go on for ever" were consistent with the intention that the Club would provide 24-hour service and would never close its doors.
_	Environmental lawyers and policymakers work to define legislation with the intention that water is maintained at an appropriate quality for its identified use.
_	The squadron moved to Netheravon on 15 April that year, and again to Bicester Airfield on 7 August, with the intention that it would receive Handley Page O/400 heavy bombers before moving to France.
_	The members of Oyneg Shabbos initially collected the material with the intention that they would write a book after the war about the horrors they had witnessed.
_	In May 1960, the British government stated that it would be prepared to grant independence to the then protectorate of British Somaliland, with the intention that the territory would unite with the Trust Territory of Somaliland under Italian Administration (the former Italian Somaliland).
_	If the Baal Tekiyah (shofar sounder) blows with the intention that all who hear will perform the mitzvah, then anyone listening—even someone passing by—who intends to hear the Shofar can perform the mitzvah because the community blower blows for everybody.
_	According to tradition, the house was designed to be a duplex, with the intention that William and Emily VanderHeyden would occupy one side and their son Fred the other.
_	The 2016 festival, which would have been the 50th anniversary of the festival, was cancelled so that resources could be directed to a substantial restoration of the sloop Clearwater, with the intention that the festival will return in 2017.
_	There was also the intention that in the same way animal liberationists "help out" with legal campaigns, earth liberationists would aid above-ground environmental organisations, notably Earth First!, by acts of ecotage.
_	After the Muslims were expelled from the city in 1857, the mosque was deemed redundant, and was auctioned by the British with the intention that it be demolished and the land be used for building new houses and shops.
_	The Longford route was built with the intention that there would be an onward line built by the private company South Lancashire Tramways (SLT) to Newton-le-Willows and beyond.
_	The last owner of the house, who had died decades before, had left it in her will to Our Lord God with the intention that the income from the house should be used for saying mass for her soul and those of her predecessors.
_	He recommended the expansion should be for the benefit of others, not mere expansion for the sake of expansion due to any blind belief—but with the intention that many more people should benefit, rather than for the sake of the organisation's growth.
_	In December 2015, the Swedish Women's Lobby and publisher Albert Bonniers revealed the book is to be distributed to every 16-year-old high school student in Sweden, with the intention that it will "work as a stepping stone for a discussion about gender equality and feminism".
_	The two men end up siring children by raping four teenage girls with the intention that they will continue their battles, only for two of their children to fall in love.
_	For example, payments may be made for 10 years, with the intention that thereafter the policy is paid-up.
_	In short, Unitarian Universalists regard the texts of the world's religions as works of people, worthy of respect, with the intention that people from all religions or spiritual backgrounds live peaceably with one another.
_	In mid-January 1937, the unit was mobilized and stationed in Ocaña with the intention that she would intervene in a planned offensive for Brunete, which will take time to complete.
_	It had been the intention that Beate and Arvid succeed him also in Gotland, but Iver had lost it to the Danish king during his last year and the island was never recovered.
_	Von Bachem renounced the title in the late 14th century, with the intention that von Hemberg and his descendants would be named his heirs to the title.
_	Many arcs were built doubled with the intention that they would be stronger.
_	In 1875, the statue was removed during alterations in the square by T. Blackwell, of Crosse and Blackwell, the venerable canned and bottled foodstuffs firm, who gave it for safekeeping to his friend, Goodall, with the intention that it might be restored.
_	In July 2014, local theatre enthusiast Colin Fine bought the theatre from the liquidators, with the intention that it continue to be developed as a theatre.
_	It is a work of joint authorship if a person creates lyrics or music with the intention that his work shall be combined with the work of another person who shall create the music or write the lyrics, as the case may be, so as to make the composition complete.
_	The agreement showed the intention that the obligation would attach to the land, and it would not matter whose hands the land came into: the owner could enforce the covenant.
_	Talmage wrote his book with the intention that it be used as a teaching tool within the LDS Church's Young Men's Mutual Improvement Association and the Young Women's Mutual Improvement Association.
_	A persistant is a special category with the intention that its instances "remain identical" (over time).
_	This was in response to a request from the Ministry of Food Control to set the poem to music, with the intention that it would be sung in schools and bring to the attention of children the importance of merchant ships - at a time when many ships had been lost to German U-boats and food rationing had just been introduced.
_	Saladin had appointed al-Afdal to the governorship of Damascus with the intention that his son should continue to see the city as his principal place of residence in order to emphasize the primacy of the "jihad" (struggle) against the Crusader states.
_	In 1979 Blythe House was formally acquired by the Government from the Savings Bank for £6.5m, with the intention that it be used for storage by museums and galleries.
_	Work had already commenced on the Hutt Valley Branch to extend it north with the intention that it eventually become the main line.
_	In 1850 the Fig Tree baths and what was left of Mrs Biggs’ women's baths were granted by the Government to Sydney Council with the intention that the Council build new baths on the site.
_	Bally had amassed a collection of about 1000 phrenological busts but most of it had been bought from him during his lifetime with the intention that it would be put on display in a museum that, at the time of his death, had not been built.
_	The injury came when Benoit threw Sabu with the intention that he take a face-first "pancake" bump, but Sabu attempted to turn mid-air and take a backdrop bump instead.
_	Then between the 16 and 28 April 1945, Neuengamme was systematically emptied of all its remaining prisoners, together other groups of concentration camp inmates and Soviet POWs; with the intention that they would be relocated to a secret new camp, either on the Baltic island of Fehmarn; or at Mysen in Norway where preparations were put in hand to house them under the control of concentration camp guards evacuated from Sachsenhausen.
_	In 1977 the rem was redefined by the ICRP as 0.01 sievert or 0.01 J/kg, with the intention that the sievert would come to replace the rem.
_	The plans for a concert were abandoned and replaced with the intention that the surviving three members would play some incidental music in between segments and interviews.
_	The government established the force with the intention that they would to oversee and coordinate investigations, collect statistics and work with the general public to stop this practice.
_	To lure home buyers with promises of large houses while keeping prices low, homes were built with large basements (basements are an unusual feature in California because its weather permits shallower foundations) with the intention that the buyers could convert the basements into living space at their own volition.
_	With Peyton being impressed by his audition, he agrees to perform, however leaves the stage with the intention that Haley would have to perform in his absence.
_	The Nailsworth railway promoters were ambitious, and sited the station on an embankment above the town with the intention that the railway would be extended southwards towards Tetbury and Malmesbury.
_	His captors gave him little or no food, but copious amounts of alcohol to drink, with the intention that he be "compelled to feed upon the insects on his body."
_	As a result of this change, the battalion was required to return all of its vehicles, with the intention that its guns would largely be carried across the battlefield by soldiers moving on foot.
_	However, in 2015, Major-General Igor Kozhin, the Commander of the Navy's Air and Air Defense Forces, announced that a second fighter regiment would be formed to augment the current force, with the intention that the MiG-29s be used by this new unit, with the existing Su-33s refurbished for further use.
_	She sent her son to Witton Grammar School in Northwich where he studied the classics with the intention that he would fulfill the family's ambition that he prepare for a career in the Church of England.
_	This movement, a network of interested people working in their locales, works on educating, passing laws, and spurring voluntary home access initiatives with the intention that basic access become a routine part of new home construction.
_	During week five, Clay agreed to be nominated alongside Becky as pawns by co-HoH Vanessa, with the intention that they would win the BoB competition and dethrone her, allowing Jackie to remain in power.
_	The "Queen's Colleges (Ireland) Act 1845" ("An Act to enable Her Majesty to endow new Colleges for the Advancement of Learning in Ireland") established the colleges with the intention that they would provide for Roman Catholic demands for university education, since Catholics did not generally attend Trinity College Dublin at that time, though there were no legal restrictions preventing them.
_	While in transit, as a result of overcrowding in training camps in the United Kingdom, the 1st Division was diverted to Egypt with the intention that it would complete its training there before moving to the Western Front at a later date.
_	This institute had left Ecgfrith so enamoured that soon after the completion of the Wearmouth Monastery, he granted Biscop another segment of land for the construction of a second monastery, Jarrow, with the intention that the two should be administered as one.
_	When Don John of Austria, after the battle of Lepanto in 1571, began to launch on a policy of self-seeking adventure, Escobedo was appointed as his secretary with the intention that he should act as a check on these follies.
_	At the same time two motorised cavalry brigades were formed with the intention that they would be equipped with the tank.
_	Industrial Light & Magic had produced a series of shots of the new "Enterprise", with the intention that these would be used throughout the series.
_	He wrote the piece with the intention that it be performed "not only on a solemn occasion, but at any time, inside or outside the Church".
_	Temporary permission was granted by the Secretary of State ... with the intention that this would give the site residents and the local authority time to find a suitable alternative site.
_	The series would begin with the 1996 first book of "A Song of Ice and Fire", "A Game of Thrones", with the intention that each novel in the series would form the basis for a season's worth of episodes.
_	At the urging of Assistant Secretary of the Navy (and future President of the United States) Franklin D. Roosevelt (1882-1945), the industrialist, financier, and philanthropist Alfred I. DuPont (1864-1935) of Wilmington, Delaware, contracted with the Herreshoff Manufacturing Company at Bristol, Rhode Island, for one of a small group of 60-ton steel-hulled boats built to a naval patrol boat design for private owners with the intention that they would be made available to the U.S. Navy in time of war.
_	In 2001, the building and 0.9 acres of land were transferred to the municipal government who then leased it to The Van Riper Historic Restoration Trust of Nutley for twenty years, with the intention that it would be restored and preserved.
_	The full text of verse 14 was suggested by Rudyard Kipling as an appropriate inscription for memorials after the First World War, with the intention that it could be carved into the Stone of Remembrance proposed by Sir Edwin Lutyens for the Imperial (now Commonwealth) war cemeteries.
_	It is not necessary for the representation to have been be received directly; it is sufficient that the representation was made to another party with the intention that it would become known to a subsequent party and ultimately acted upon by them.
_	The track "Summer's Gone" was originally meant to be the final song on the final Beach Boys album, and according to Thomas, the album's original title was "Summer's Gone" with the intention that it would be the final Beach Boys album.
_	Some exceptions to this is where a reduced rate was given (where the possible intention here to reduce the capital balance as quickly as possible, thereby reducing the loan to value) or where the type of forbearance is for the lifetime of the loan, i.e. a split loan where 1 part of the loan is parked until the expiry date, with the intention that at that time a suitable repayment vehicle (say, sale of asset) is in place for the repayment of the loan in full.
_	The slots aligned with 2XL's 4 buttons, with the intention that dropping the checker would also press the appropriate track button on 2XL.
_	In February 2016, Norris Castle was bought for £4.7 million, with the intention that it be renovated and opened as a luxury hotel.
_	A number of documents were approved by the Shadow Commission with the intention that they should be implemented as soon as is possible after the establishment of the Assembly Commission following the May 2007 elections.
_	Graham returned to Cumberland and began a programme of improving the family estate at Netherby, with the intention that such improvements would benefit both the landowner and the tenant.
_	The department was created by the Whitlam Government in 1974, expanding on the narrower Repatriation Department, with the intention that the new department would perform a wider total function of compensation to deserving groups in the community.
_	While from a Catholic viewpoint there have been tensions concerning some developments of the practice of hesychasm, the Pope said, there is no denying the goodness of the intention that inspired its defence.
_	She worked with the Champion of the Universe to promote a fight with the intention that the Champion of the Universe is still the strongest in the universe.
_	with the intention that the students in each posse will support each other.
_	After the tour concluded the original ten sculptures were sent back to their original locations with the bespoke plinths made for the exhibition with the intention that they continue to be accessible to the public.
_	In 2006 Zinifex formed a joint venture with Umicore to create Nyrstar, which owns the smelter, with the intention that it would eventually be an entity separate from the parent companies.
_	He collaborated with the CIA to collect information on a wide variety of torture methods, and stated the intention that his research program would:
_	In March 2008, Alan Sugar made an announcement that he intended to propose to the BBC of creating a junior version of "The Apprentice" owing to its success, with the intention that it would feature children aged between 12-15 and be aired during an early evening timeslot.
_	Wu was impressed, and in winter 528 he created Yuan Hao the Prince of Wei, with the intention that Yuan Hao seize the Northern Wei throne and serve as a vassal to Liang.
_	The Baptist Union bought the couple’s home at 166 Colombo Street and obtained a pound for pound subsidy from the Government with the intention that this should become ‘a home for aged Baptists of the Canterbury-Westland Auxiliary Area’.
_	The campaign was chaired by JML chairman and Labour party donor John Mills, and directed by Dominic Moffitt, with party support from over 50 councillors, three council leaders and MPs including Kate Hoey, John McDonnell and Keith Vaz, the campaign aimed to move the policy of the Labour Party to one which supports a referendum on membership of the EU, with the intention that this might help to secure a victory in the 2015 general election.
_	While from a Catholic viewpoint there have been tensions concerning some developments of the practice, the Pope said, there is no denying the goodness of the intention that inspired its defence, which was to stress that man is offered the concrete possibility of uniting himself in his inner heart with God in that profound union of grace known as "theosis", divinization.
_	Time capsules are placed with the intention that they will be opened or accessed at a future date.
_	It was planned as a "Permanent" ROF with the intention that, unlike some other similar facilities, it would remain open for production after the end of World War II.
_	Cousins planned to retire in 2018, with the intention that he would be succeeded as CEO by Dominic Blakemore on 1 April; the succession was brought forward to 1 January 2018.
_	There were present symbols of children's stories, with the intention that the child felt transported to the world of imagination.
_	The Trustee will be sending her to a local college with all expenses paid, with the intention that she educate herself to become a writer.
_	From the beginning it was the intention that the radio service should join television on a broadcasting campus at Donnybrook.
_	It was intended that C-in-C should deal primarily with matters of major military policy and strategy, but it was not the intention that the C-in-C should assume any administrative or financial responsibilities or take over any of the day-to-day functions at that time exercised by the General (or Air) Officers Commanding (GOC) of the different areas.
_	In these circumstances the Ottoman state organised a congress in Debar in 1909 with the intention that Albanians there declare themselves as Ottomans, promise to defend its territorial sovereignty and adopt an Albanian Arabic character script.
_	It is the intention that democracy is sought to be trained on an everyday level and that practical participation in the democratic development and arrangement of the school is one of the most vital tasks for schools in our time.
_	In July 2014, Connecticut Governor Dannel Malloy approved the project and authorized $2.75 million in bonds for preliminary planning, with the intention that the station would be open in late 2018.
_	The aircraft was announced in April 2013, with the intention that it would fill the gap between the ASK 21 trainer and the larger Open Class two seaters.
_	The 21st Machine Gun Company, however, had been formed in England in February 1917, initially as the 16th Machine Gun Company, with the intention that it would be assigned to the newly formed 16th Brigade, but it was redesignated in March 1917 and assigned to the 1st Division to supplement the brigade machine gun companies.
_	The rehearsals were filmed and recorded by director Michael Lindsay-Hogg with the intention that the documentary film would accompany a televised concert by the Beatles.
_	However, none of these were as large or ambitious as Seacroft, with the intention that these areas use many of the amenities built along with the Seacroft Estate such as the Civic Centre and Seacroft's secondary schools.
_	The transport contained young able-bodied Jewish men, with the intention that the men would assist in building the ghetto.
_	On August 15, 2017, water was restored to the fountain as a test run, with the intention that it will stay on until November, when the ice rink reopens.
_	He gave it to his friend, the artist Frederick Goodall, with the intention that it might be restored.
_	The lane was restored for normal motorway running at the end of 2010 for 18 months using an Experimental Traffic Order and was re-established for the duration of the 2012 Summer Olympics with the intention that it would then be removed permanently.
_	Barclay was credited with inventing the first-ever football helmet in 1894, with the intention that it would prevent cauliflower ears.
_	A scow was adapted for use as a cable ferry, with the intention that this ferry would operate for a five-year period.
_	This move guaranteed that they would be beyond the reach of his enemies, with the intention that Vicente would end serving as the chaplain of these properties, receiving a stable income and inheriting at least part of his fortune.
_	Little said that, in the short term, he wanted to ensure that around 320 pupils per year receive bursaries, and that 70 were educated free of charge, with the intention that the number of pupils receiving financial assistance would continue to increase.
_	Oliver stated that this unit was tasked with recruiting plaintiffs to sue the Cult Awareness Network, with the intention that these lawsuits would put CAN out of business.
_	In autumn 1985, following the financial and critical disappointment of "A View to a Kill", work began on scripts for the next Bond film, with the intention that Roger Moore would not reprise the role of James Bond.
_	In 2011 the Minister for the Environment Nick Smith announced that the government will introduce a Freedom Camping Bill into Parliament with the intention that the law will be in place before the Rugby World Cup.
_	Vanessa nominated Clay and Becky with the intention that they would win the BoB competition and dethrone her, as she did not want to be directly responsible for Austin's eviction.
_	Their mission statement is " To provide public amenities and to preserve, protect and promote the public park known as Chippewa Park located in and owned by the City of Thunder Bay with the intention that the park reaches its full potential as a public recreation area to the full benefit of the community."
_	The remaining property, including the historic Kirkbride building, was turned over to the state's treasurer in October 2007 as excess property with the intention that it would be sold.
_	Afterwards, the idea was developed to install LED laser beams in the Merlion's eyes, with the intention that laser would be part of the musical fountain's show.
_	In May 1975, Liberia became a signatory to the treaty that established the Economic Community of West African States (ECOWAS) in order to create a common market in West Africa and promote regional economic integration and stability in 15 West African countries, with the intention that it would mirror the success of the European Common Market (now the EU).
_	Boullée and Ledoux were a specific influence on subsequent Greek Revival architects and especially Benjamin Henry Latrobe who carried through the style in the United States for public architecture with the intention that the spirit of the ancient Athenian democracy would be echoed by buildings serving the new democracy of the United States of America.
_	It was understood that the simplicity of the guidelines was a crucial factor in order to engage as many people as possible to the new cause, with the intention that the ELF would quickly become as popular as the ALF.
_	Towards the end of the 1980s, at the depths of the economic slump for Liverpool the funding dried up for the Institute and in 1987 it was sold and its management, The Florence Institute Incorporated Company, was dissolved in 1988 with the intention that the charitable work should be continued by another body.
_	Africa Burns Creative Projects (AfrikaBurn) was created in 2007 as a not-for-profit company, with the intention that it would serve as a vehicle for the creation and co-ordination of an independent South African Burning Man regional event.
_	Parliament must have conferred the discretion with the intention that it should be used to promote the policy and objects of the Act, and the Minister could not act so as to frustrate the policy and objects of the Act.
_	The land comprising Helen L. McNitt State Park was donated by its former owners, the McNitt family, to the State of New York in 1999 with the intention that it be used as a public park.
_	The female Squid's toxin causes joy instead of despair, with the intention that the victim becomes complacent, causing the crew to choose to remain temporarily trapped in their delusions.
_	"Tayloe" was moored in the Thames with the intention that she be the receiving point for all inmates whose sentences of transportation to the Americas had been delayed by the War of Independence.
_	At the same time two motorised cavalry brigades were formed with the intention that they would be equipped with the tank.
_	These were intensive six day events for 60–90 teachers, with the first aimed at more experienced teachers with the intention that they would pass the skills to others at their schools, and later courses aimed at newer teachers at the beginning of their careers.
_	This approach encourages development of flexor and extensor synergies during early recovery, with the intention that synergic activation of muscles will, with training, transition into voluntary activation of movements.
_	On 12 December 2004, the company completely recast its timetable, for the first time in the South West region since 1967, in an attempt to bring service provision into line with changing demand and to take into account the different characteristics of modern rolling stock, with the intention that this would improve reliability and punctuality across the network.
_	However, subsequent to this proposal, the government announced plans to electrify the GOBLIN, with the intention that TfL will procure a new fleet of 4-car EMUs (Class 710) for use on both this route and the inner suburban routes from Liverpool Street, which was taken over by London Overground from 2015.
_	Emma surprisingly gave the Dark One dagger to Regina with the intention that if she goes too dark Regina would be the only one that would willingly "put her down."
_	A sacrificial act was done without specific intent for a Passover sacrifice if it was done with the intention that it be a peace offering ("shelamim").
_	To remedy this, Inglis designed a reusable steel bridge, with the intention that it could be erected and dismantled by the unit in a single afternoon.
_	Article 2.1 of the 1999 sectoral United Nations International Convention for the Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism (Terrorist Financing Convention) defines the crime of terrorist financing as the offence committed by "any person" who "by any means, directly or indirectly, unlawfully and wilfully, provides or collects funds with the intention that they should be used or in the knowledge that they are to be used, in full or in part, in order to carry out" an act "intended to cause death or serious bodily injury to a civilian, or to any other person not taking an active part in the hostilities in a situation of armed conflict, when the purpose of such act, by its nature or context, is to intimidate a population, or to compel a government or an international organization to do or to abstain from doing any act."
_	In mid-1886 Watts and his assistant Cecil Schott painted a duplicate of the piece, with the intention that this duplicate be donated to the nation allowing him to sell the original.
_	Subsequently it was transferred to the Municipality of Cascais, which includes the town of Estoril, with the intention that it be restored.
_	Gaius was elected consul "designatus" by the "Comitia Centuriata" in 6BC with the intention that he should assume the consulship in his twentieth year.
_	The Soviet Union started a programme to replace all Dnepr (NATO: Hen House) radars with the intention that this would be complete by the mid 1990s and five Daryals were under construction by 1983.
_	Camp III was established on 2 May by Smythe, Shipton, Birnie, Boustead, Wood-Johnson and Longland, together with porters, with the intention that it would be wholly independent of Base Camp and could swiftly supply higher camps.
_	A second resolution was being drafted with the intention that it would find Iraq in "material breach" and the "serious consequences" of Resolution 1441 should be implemented.
_	A copy of this Note was sent to Jinnah with the intention that his proposal of a united Indian Federation be adopted by Muslim League in the forthcoming Session at Lahore 22–24 March.
_	According to Cardinal Tamburini, Joseph III consecrated a 23- or 25-year-old priest named Antony Gallo as his coadjutor on 20 November 1754, with the intention that he would eventually succeed him as Amid patriarch.
_	In this circumstances the Ottoman state organised a congress in Debar in 1909 with the intention that Albanians there declare themselves as Ottomans, promise to defend its territorial sovereignty and adopt an Albanian Arabic character script.
_	The order was given the name of The Visitation of Holy Mary with the intention that the sisters would follow the example of Virgin Mary and her joyful visit to her kinswoman Elizabeth, (known as "The Visitation" in the Roman Catholic Church).
_	One possible meaning is of someone who creeps around a packed church to pray at each of the Stations of the Cross hanging on the walls with the intention that everyone in the pews can see him doing so, as if to say "notice how religious I am".
_	The GNB is written in a simple, everyday language, with the intention that everyone can appreciate it, and so is often considered particularly suitable for children and for those learning English.
_	Gannon wrote the series with the intention that it would be transmitted at 8.00pm, before the watershed; however, the BBC instead scheduled it at 9.30pm.
_	The Medical Women's Foundation built upon the Association of Registered Medical Women, which had been founded in London in 1879 with the intention that it would 'speak on behalf of all medical women and represent their interests.'
_	The corpus covers British English of the late 20th century from a wide variety of genres, with the intention that it be a representative sample of spoken and written British English of that time.
_	The voyage had begun at Gravesend with the intention that she would sail to Calais, but the Board of Trade inspector on board ordered her into Dover as she approached the North Foreland.
_	Sarai then offered her Egyptian handmaiden, Hagar, to Abram with the intention that she would bear him a son.
_	A persistant is a special category with the intention that its instances "remain identical" over time.
_	In September 2005, Porsche announced it would increase its 5% stake in Volkswagen to 20% at a cost of €3 billion, with the intention that the combined stakes of Porsche and the government of Lower Saxony would ensure that any hostile takeover by foreign investors would be impossible.
_	On April 30, 2008, Thailand announced plans for the creation of the Organisation of Rice Exporting Countries (OREC) with the intention that this should develop into a price-fixing cartel for rice.
_	Construction began in November 1730 under the Marquis of Verboom with the intention that the lines would block any British invasion of Spanish territory mounted from Gibraltar, act as a starting point for any future Spanish operations against Gibraltar, and cut off access to the territory by land.
_	On 31 July 2016, Duff joined the Shamrock Rovers first-team coaching staff until the end of the season, with the intention that he would then take control of the under-15 group he previously managed, then competing in the League of Ireland U17 Division.
_	The region of Sub-Carpathia was given special autonomous status with the intention that (eventually) it would be self-governed by the Ruthenian minority.
_	In January 1865, he was assigned to the at Shreveport, Louisiana with the intention that she become a raider in the Pacific Ocean.
_	Upon launch, Channel 5's programming followed a strict schedule with the intention that viewers could tune in and always know what to expect.
_	The game was designed with both newcomers and series fans in mind, with the intention that it should be enjoyable for both.
_	The club became, as a consequence, more arm's-length from Shell with the intention that Shell's subsidy would gradually reduce.
_	Both John Quincy Adams and Franklin Pierce swore on a book of law, with the intention that they were swearing on the constitution.
_	It was the first typeface to be designed with the intention that it should be expanded upon by the Open Source community.
_	with the intention that their new version, released in 1991, would form the basis of GNU Emacs version 19.
_	In May 1960, the British government stated that it would be prepared to grant independence to the then protectorate of British Somaliland, with the intention that the territory would unite with the Italian-administered Trust Territory of Somaliland under Italian Administration (the former Italian Somaliland).
_	Further spaceports are planned in Abu Dhabi and elsewhere, with the intention that the spaceline will have a worldwide availability and commodity in the future.
_	after a few months he was invited to join work on a IBM 650 drum computer, with the intention that he would than promote the use of the computer amongst his erstwhile analog-working co workers.
_	The site was deliberately located equidistant from London, Birmingham, Leicester, Oxford and Cambridge with the intention that it would be self-sustaining and eventually become a major regional centre in its own right.
_	It was launched with the intention that the service could help alert CCGs and individual GP surgeries to potential localised health outbreaks that could impact on surgery enquiries.
_	The Commissioners' Plan retained Broadway and Bloomingdale Road up to 23rd Street, with the intention that the uptown sections would be demapped.
_	Work carried out in 2008 to create the Killamarsh Greenway brought large sections of the original canal towpath back into use as a traffic-free route through the town, with the intention that once restoration is complete, a significant section of the towpath will already be in a usable state.
_	He was appointed to the office by his brother-in-law John Child with the intention that he should reduce the costs of operations for the East India Company in Bombay.
_	The idea for the restaurant was first proposed in 1941 with the intention that it would also cook meals for schools and other establishments in the Borough such as rest homes.
_	All three of the skateparks built for the event were collaborations between event organizers, skaters, and the host cities, with the intention that the facilities would remain as permanent parks in those communities after events have been completed.
_	The existing building was sold to the Vanport Extension Center (now Portland State University) in April 1949 for $875,000, with the intention that the high school would not leave for "at least two years."
_	Although it was the intention that the collection would be worked upon whilst there, the intervening years of World War II led to a severe staff shortage, meaning the work was stalled until after the end of the war.
_	As "A Day in the Life" ends, a 15-kilohertz high-frequency tone is heard; it was added at Lennon's suggestion with the intention that it would annoy dogs.
_	The group was split into two main parties—one for Campbell Island and one for the Auckland Islands—with the intention that the groups were to be dropped off to survey while the "NZGSS Hinemoa" conducted its regular round of checking the castaway depots at other subantarctic islands before returning to pick the groups up.
_	Men who donate their semen to a sperm bank do so with the intention that it will be used to enable women to have children whose partners have 'male factor' problems which prevent them from fathering children, or, more commonly, that their sperm will be used to impregnate women who have no male partner, such as single women and coupled lesbians.
_	Initially, it was composed of just a single desk officer with the intention that it would be augmented by additional personnel when required.
_	Because of this effect in BWRs, operating components and safety systems are designed with the intention that no credible scenario can cause a pressure and power increase that exceeds the systems' capability to quickly shut down the reactor before damage to the fuel or to components containing the reactor coolant can occur.
_	It was issued by Pope Pius X at the beginning of the 20th century in Italian, with the intention that all Catholics could easily understand their faith.
_	The piece featured eight dancers and eight chairs, with the intention that each dancer and chair portrayed a specific character in a secluded room.
_	Within a year four "groups" operated in South East England, covering much of Kent, Sussex, Hampshire and Essex, with the intention that a total of eighteen groups would cover the whole of Great Britain.
_	Initially, the company had been designated the 17th Machine Gun Company, with the intention that it would be assigned to the newly forming 17th Brigade, but later the decision was made to assign the extra company at divisional level so that each division had four companies, and in March 1917, the company was redesignated as the 22nd and assigned to the 2nd Division, arriving in France at the end of the month, during the fighting around Ypres.
_	Raffman had written the music in piano notation and in a register appropriate for the piano but with the intention that it be played on the guitar.
_	It was created with the intention that workers across the country volunteer a few hour of work on their work centers.
_	When confronted by the suspect she pretended to be looking for a lost dog with the intention that the suspect would not suspect her real motives.
_	In 1955, Heifer International donated 15 pure-bred cows to the school with the intention that the offspring be donated to needy farm families.
_	In computer graphics, color quantization or color image quantization is quantization applied to color spaces; it is a process that reduces the number of distinct colors used in an image, usually with the intention that the new image should be as visually similar as possible to the original image.
_	Upon entering service, the twelve ships were assigned to the United States Atlantic Fleet, with the intention that they remain in service for approximately twelve months before being transferred to the United States Navy Reserve.
_	He brought both under the Loftus Road PLC umbrella with the intention that both teams would share the stadium.
_	In 2003, the Montana-based Charles M. Bair Family Trust, recognizing that the YAM's own permanent collection had grown faster than expectation and that the YAM needed to expand storage, made a grant to the YAM in 2005 to purchase the warehouse at 505 North 26th Street, with the intention that it be converted into high quality, expanded collection storage space.
_	A work is considered a joint work if it is a "work prepared by two or more authors with the intention that their contributions be merged into an inseparable or interdependent parts of a unitary whole."
_	The plan is that Gravvins will invite the local aristocracy to a garden party, to meet the honeymoon couple, with the intention that the Marchioness will be impressed with Marilynn's social standing.
_	"Savage Worlds" adventures come in two formats - Savage Tales, which are designed as standalone adventures, and Plot Point campaigns, which are looser in design and made up of a series of self-contained adventures which link together and build to a climax over time, with the intention that smaller events be woven throughout at the GM's discretion.
_	Mackey had been the surgeon of the fur trading brig "Captain Cook", under Captain James Strange, who had left Mackay at Nootka in July 1786, with the intention that Mackay befriend the indigenous people, learn their customs, and collect sea otter pelts for trade when Strange returned.
_	The U.S. intended to refurbish the B61 bombs under its Life Extension Program with the intention that the weapons should remain operational until at least 2025.
_	Zhang was to entice the kingdom to return to its ancestral lands with promises of Han military assistance, with the intention that Yuezhi forces would fight against the Xiongnu.
_	On the contrary, if the consumer experience towards the advertised product has a negative disconfirmation, the consumer will spread rumor to other consumers or society at large with the intention that impact to a bad perception of a product.
_	This shows the intention that Solihull Moors want younger players to come through their ranks and try and break into the first team whilst already having experience from adult football.
_	In its initial years the program offered a five-year B.Arch Degree program, with the intention that a graduate degree program be initiated at a later date.
_	In a planned structural deficit, the government may commit to spending money on the future of the country in order to improve the productive potential of the economy, for example investing in infrastructure, education, or transport, with the intention that this investment will yield long-term economic gains.
_	Once Mitchell graduated from high school, she went to business college for two years—going at night, working in the day—to pay her own way, with the intention that once she completed that and was employed, she could pay her way through college.
_	The Manchester and Glasgow services were split off, with Glasgow's service retaining the name 96.3 Rock Radio, with the intention that it would be sold off, and continue to broadcast to Glasgow on FM and DAB as an independent station, with GMG operating Real XS from Manchester; however, GMG subsequently took the Glasgow station off the market and confirmed that it would relaunch as 96.3 Real Radio XS in late October 2011.
_	When the troubles of the French Revolution spilled over onto German territory, the abbey buildings were requisitioned by the French army, and monks were obliged to leave the abbey, at first with the intention that this was to be a temporary absence, living from 1794 to 1802 in the parish house ("Mattheiser Pfarrhaus").
_	It had been the intention that the permanent pier railway would be worked by electric traction, supplied by overhead lines, but this was never implemented.
_	Under the orders of Peter Stuyvesant, the director of the Dutch West India Company, Van Dyk built large stone warehouses at Freebottom, near Port Purcell (just east of Road Town), with the intention that these warehouses would facilitate exchanges of cargo between North and South America.
_	Like the earlier FP-45 Liberator, it was designed primarily for assassination of enemy soldiers, with the intention that it would be replaced by an enemy soldier's left-over equipment.
_	After a campaign by "The Sun" newspaper to raise the £10,000 necessary for the recovery of the whale's skeleton, it was announced on 23 January that the bones of the mammal were to be given to the Natural History Museum with the intention that they be used for scientific research.
_	This was created with the intention that users will draw a line parallel to a plane in the image, and reorient the image to that plane to more easily achieve certain perspectives.
_	In 1952 Julian Blaustein, executive producer at Twentieth Century-Fox, purchased the film rights for "The Brotherhood of Fear," with the intention that Ardrey would be engaged to write the screenplay.
